hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		rder
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		recer
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		recoger
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		recrecer
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		remeter
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		rer
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		responder
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		tecer
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		tender
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		tener
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		ter
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		terger
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		udecer
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		uecer
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		vecer
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		ver
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		verdecer
SFX V		 er		 ieseis		volver
SFX V		 er		 iese		lecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		ler
SFX V		 er		 iese		llecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		mecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		mer
SFX V		 er		 iese		mohecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		acer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		alecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		andecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		anecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		aparecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		arecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		barrer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		becer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		blandecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		ceder
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		cer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		cerner
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		coger
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		converger
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		decer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		der
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		doler
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		ecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		emoler
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		ender
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		ener
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		entender
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		er
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		erger
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		etener
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		exceder
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		ger
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		hacer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		hender
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		jer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		lecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		ler
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		llecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		mohecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		moler
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		morder
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		nacer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		necer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		ner
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		ocer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		olecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		oler
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		oponer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		orecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		parecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		per
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		poner
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		prender
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		quecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		rbecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		rdecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		rder
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		recer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		recrecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		remeter
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		rer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		rger
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		rrer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		rter
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		sponer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		tardecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		tecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		tejer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		uecer
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		vender
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		ver
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		verter
SFX V		 er		 iésemos		volver
SFX V		 er		 iesen		acer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		alecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		andecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		aparecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		arecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		arnecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ber
SFX V		 er		 iesen		brecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ceder
SFX V		 er		 iesen		cender
SFX V		 er		 iesen		cer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		coger
SFX V		 er		 iesen		converger
SFX V		 er		 iesen		crudecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		decer
SFX V		 er		 iese		nder
SFX V		 er		 iesen		der
SFX V		 er		 iesen		descender
SFX V		 er		 iese		necer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		emoler
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ender
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ener
SFX V		 er		 iese		ner
SFX V		 er		 iesen		er
SFX V		 er		 iesen		erger
SFX V		 er		 iesen		escoger
SFX V		 er		 iesen		establecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		exceder
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ger
SFX V		 er		 iesen		hacer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		idecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		jer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		lecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ler
SFX V		 er		 iesen		llecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		lobreguecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		mecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		mer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		mohecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		moler
SFX V		 er		 iesen		mover
SFX V		 er		 iesen		mpeler
SFX V		 er		 iesen		mprender
SFX V		 er		 iesen		nder
SFX V		 er		 iesen		necer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ner
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ocer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ometer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		peler
SFX V		 er		 iesen		pender
SFX V		 er		 iesen		per
SFX V		 er		 iesen		poner
SFX V		 er		 iesen		prender
SFX V		 er		 iesen		rder
SFX V		 er		 iesen		recer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		remeter
SFX V		 er		 iesen		rer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		rger
SFX V		 er		 iesen		rnecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		scender
SFX V		 er		 iesen		sorber
SFX V		 er		 iesen		tecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		tejer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		tender
SFX V		 er		 iesen		tener
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ter
SFX V		 er		 iesen		udecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		uecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		umecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		valecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		vecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		ver
SFX V		 er		 iesen		verdecer
SFX V		 er		 iesen		volver
SFX V		 er		 iese		ocer
SFX V		 er		 iese		oler
SFX V		 er		 iese		ometer
SFX V		 er		 iese		oponer
SFX V		 er		 iese		per
SFX V		 er		 iese		poner
SFX V		 er		 iese		prender
SFX V		 er		 iese		quecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		querer
SFX V		 er		 iese		rdecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		rder
SFX V		 er		 iese		recer
SFX V		 er		 iese		remeter
SFX V		 er		 iese		rer
SFX V		 er		 iese		rger
SFX V		 er		 iese		rnecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		rrer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		acer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		alecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		aler
SFX V		 er		 ieses		andecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		aparecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		arecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		ber
SFX V		 er		 ieses		blandecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		ceder
SFX V		 er		 iese		scender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		cender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		cer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		decer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		descender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		ecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		ender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		entender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		er
SFX V		 er		 ieses		erger
SFX V		 er		 ieses		escoger
SFX V		 er		 ieses		exceder
SFX V		 er		 ieses		ger
SFX V		 er		 ieses		hacer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		jecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		lecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		ler
SFX V		 er		 ieses		llecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		moler
SFX V		 er		 ieses		mpeler
SFX V		 er		 ieses		mprender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		nacer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		nder
SFX V		 er		 ieses		necer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		olecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		oler
SFX V		 er		 ieses		onder
SFX V		 er		 iese		sorber
SFX V		 er		 ieses		parecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		peler
SFX V		 er		 ieses		pender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		per
SFX V		 er		 iese		sponer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		poner
SFX V		 er		 ieses		prender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		quecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		querer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		rdecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		rder
SFX V		 er		 ieses		recer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		recoger
SFX V		 er		 ieses		recrecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		remeter
SFX V		 er		 ieses		rer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		responder
SFX V		 er		 ieses		scender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		tecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		tender
SFX V		 er		 ieses		uecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		umecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		valecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		vecer
SFX V		 er		 ieses		ver
SFX V		 er		 ieses		volver
SFX V		 er		 iese		tardecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		tecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		tender
SFX V		 er		 iese		ter
SFX V		 er		 iese		udecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		uecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		umecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		urecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		valecer
SFX V		 er		 iese		ver
SFX V		 er		 iese		volver
SFX V		 er		 iga		aer
SFX V		 er		 iga		bstraer
SFX V		 er		 iga		er
SFX V		 er		 igáis		aer
SFX V		 er		 igáis		traer
SFX V		 er		 igamos		etraer
SFX V		 er		 igamos		raer
SFX V		 er		 igamos		traer
SFX V		 er		 igan		bstraer
SFX V		 er		 igan		er
SFX V		 er		 igan		etraer
SFX V		 er		 igan		raer
SFX V		 er		 igan		straer
SFX V		 er		 igan		traer
SFX V		 er		 igas		aer
SFX V		 er		 igas		bstraer
SFX V		 er		 igas		er
SFX V		 er		 igas		straer
SFX V		 er		 iga		straer
SFX V		 er		 igas		traer
SFX V		 er		 iga		traer
SFX V		 er		 igo		etraer
SFX V		 er		 igo		raer
SFX V		 er		 igo		traer
SFX V		 er		 imos		acer
SFX V		 er		 ímos		aer
SFX V		 er		 imos		alecer
SFX V		 er		 imos		andecer
SFX V		 er		 imos		aparecer
SFX V		 er		 imos		arecer
SFX V		 er		 imos		arnecer
SFX V		 er		 imos		becer
SFX V		 er		 imos		ber
SFX V		 er		 imos		brecer
SFX V		 er		 imos		ceder
SFX V		 er		 imos		cer
SFX V		 er		 imos		coger
SFX V		 er		 imos		crudecer
SFX V		 er		 imos		decer
SFX V		 er		 imos		ecer
SFX V		 er		 imos		eder
SFX V		 er		 ímos		eer
SFX V		 er		 imos		emoler
