hunspell/spanish.dic
abarbechar/V
abemolar/V
abofetear/V
abreguir/V
abstener/V
acachetar/V
acaparar/V
acedar/V
achaparrar/V
aclocar/V
acomplejar/V
acorrar/V
acridonar/V
acuerdar/V
aderzar/V
adoquinar/V
adulzorer/V
afianzar/V
agacher/V
agraciar/V
aguachinar/V
agurrar/V
ahorquillar/V
ajovar/V
alazar/V
alcuzar/V
alexitimir/V
aliñar/V
aljamiar/V
almidonar/V
altivar/V
amajadar/V
amazonar/V
amilorir/V
amoratar/V
amplificar/V
anaquelar/V
angustiar/V
antagallar/V
anticarbonillar/V
anubarrar/V
apanar/V
apear/V
apestar/V
aplebeer/V
aportar/V
aproer/V
aquitanar/V
arelar/V
armatostar/V
arratoñar/V
arriar/V
arropar/V
asalariar/V
asentir/V
asobinar/V
astringir/V
atajar/V
atarragar/V
ater/V
atomizar/V
atufar/V
autocontrolar/V
avanecer/V
avituallar/V
azolar/V
babuchar/V
balancear/V
ballesterar/V
baquir/V
barrear/V
bastir/V
beatificar/V
beriberir/V
bichear/V
billardar/V
bit/r/V
blindar/V
bolar/V
bordear/V
brandar/V
bridir/V
brutalizar/V
buller/V
cabezar/V
cacear/V
calabazatar/V
calendar/V
calr/V
campear/V
canjear/V
capirotar/V
carapar/V
cardenchar/V
carrasposar/V
cascamajar/V
cataratar/V
cauteñir/V
cedacer/V
cementiclar/V
centuplicar/V
certer/V
chachar/V
chancletear/V
charquear/V
chicotear/V
chisporrotear/V
chulear/V
ciguatar/V
cipar/V
cirolar/V
claudicar/V
cáncamar/V
cocear/V
coextensionar/V
coleccionar/V
colonizar/V
comer/V
compartir/V
completer/V
comulgar/V
conciliar/V
condilar/V
confitar/V
congraciar/V
consabir/V
constrinar/V
contextuar/V
contradicar/V
contramandar/V
contravalar/V
convergir/V
copear/V
corcusir/V
corpórear/V
cortinillar/V
costillar/V
criobisturiar/V
cronoescalar/V
cuabrir/V
cubicar/V
cuchumbiar/V
cumpliderar/V
custodiar/V
deambular/V
decenar/V
dedar/V
defraudar/V
demandar/V
dentar/V
depravar/V
derrubiar/V
desaceitar/V
desaerir/V
desamoblar/V
desarer/V
desatracar/V
descadillar/V
descendir/V
descompnsar/V
descosistir/V
deseabrir/V
desempotrar/V
desenganchar/V
desentrañar/V
desflorecer/V
deshomologar/V
deslir/V
desmerecer/V
desorientar/V
despelotar/V
desplumar/V
destajar/V
destrocar/V
desviver/V
devastar/V
diferenciar/V
diqoler/V
disimilar/V
divinizar/V
dormitir/V
egregiar/V
embaidar/V
embermejecer/V
embridir/V
emparchar/V
empireumar/V
enajenar/V
encamar/V
encaucir/V
enclencar/V
encriptar/V
enechar/V
enfur/V
engordar/V
enjoyar/V
enmendar/V
enrodrigar/V
ensenar/V
enternezar/V
entremezclar/V
entullecer/V
enviudar/V
erradicar/V
escaramucear/V
escorificar/V
esfuercer/V
esperminar/V
establecer/V
estilizar/V
estuchar/V
exangar/V
expectorer/V
exterminar/V
fachendonar/V
farolar/V
feucar/V
fisioterapeutar/V
fontanar/V
francesar/V
frontir/V
futurar/V
garbear/V
gemirar/V
gliptografiar/V
gradar/V
grosular/V
guarnir/V
hacer/V
heli-esquiar/V
hibridizar/V
hitar/V
horner/V
hurguillar/V
impelar/V
impulsar/V
incontrolar/V
inestimar/V
ingrávir/V
inquirir/V
insurreccionar/V
intestar/V
inver/V
izar/V
jersar/V
karmar/V
lagotear/V
largar/V
legionellar/V
licántropar/V
lir/V
locar/V
lustrar/V
magrear/V
malinterpretar/V
mangonear/V
marcar/V
matraquear/V
melindrar/V
mesurar/V
milenar/V
ménadar/V
monetar/V
morrar/V
muflar/V
máxer/V
negruzc/V
nochar/V
nutrer/V
obviar/V
olvidar/V
orillar/V
pacaer/V
palotear/V
parafrastar/V
partelucir/V
patriciar/V
peinerar/V
percheronar/V
perquerer/V
petrolear/V
pinedar/V
pizarrar/V
pleitear/V
policorrentar/V
portaalmizclar/V
praliñar/V
predefiñir/V
premorir/V
preterir/V
profer/V
propincuar/V
óptir/V
purificar/V
quingomboar/V
rajar/V
rastrallar/V
reatar/V
recalentar/V
recocer/V
recopilar/V
recurrar/V
reescribir/V
refulgir/V
rehuir/V
relevarar/V
remolinar/V
repar/V
reprimir/V
resener/V
restrinar/V
retrar/V
revertar/V
rifirrafar/V
rocar/V
ruñar/V
sacamanchar/V
salivar/V
sangriar/V
secar/V
semifluir/V
serpollar/V
siguender/V
soñar/V
sobrepintar/V
solar/V
sorber/V
subintrar/V
subvalorar/V
sunnir/V
susteñir/V
taladrar/V
tardar/V
televisar/V
ternezar/V
tintinear/V
torer/V
trajar/V
transpolar/V
traslumbrar/V
trasvinar/V
tráilerar/V
tropecer/V
turber/V
unar/V
usazar/V
varear/V
ventriloquir/V
viceconsiliar/V
vis-a-vir/V
vórtizar/V
zahirar/V
zulacar/V
